Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.090

Bonds—Insurance as reimbursable expense.

The county legislative authority shall provide for the bonding of each district judge, district judge pro tempore, district court commissioner, clerk of the district court, and court employee, at the expense of the county, in such amount as the county legislative authority shall prescribe, conditioned that each such person will pay over according to law all moneys which shall come into the person's custody in causes filed in the district court. Such bond shall not be less than the maximum amount of money liable to be under the control, at any one time, of each such person in the performance of his or her duties. Such bond may be a blanket bond. If the county obtains errors and omissions insurance covering district court personnel, the costs of such coverage shall be a reimbursable expense pursuant to RCW 3.62.050 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1984 c 258 s 15; 1971 c 73 s 5; 1961 c 299 s 18.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.